Alabama, session 2026rs, HB267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
23 Section 1. Sections 9-3-5, 9-3-7, 9-13-3, 9-13-10,
24 9-13-11, 9-13-12, 9-13-140, 9-13-141, 9-13-142, 9-13-221, and
25 9-13-225, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
26 follows:
27 "§9-3-5
28 It shall be the duty of the Alabama Forestry Commission
Page 1

It shall be the duty of the Alabama Forestry Commission
HB267 Enrolled
29 to appoint with the advice and consent of the Governor a State
30 Forester who shall serve as the executive secretary and
31 administrative officer for the commission. The person
32 soindividual appointed as the State Forester must have earned
33 a minimum of a bachelor of science degree in forestry and must
34 be licensed and registered under the forestry laws of Alabama
35 with considerable experience in the forestry field. The State
36 Forester shall receive a salary as fixed by the commission and
37 shall serve at the pleasure of the commission and shall
38 receive actual expenses. Notwithstanding any other provisions
39 of law, the State Forester shall earn and use annual and sick
40 leave and receive reimbursement when traveling on official
41 business of the commission, as if he or she were an employee
42 in the classified or unclassified service of the state. The
43 State Forester shall in no other way be subject to or receive
44 benefits of the state Merit System. Until otherwise provided
45 for by the commission, the present State Forester of the
46 Division of Forestry of the Department of Conservation and
47 Natural Resources shall continue to serve as the State
48 Forester under the commission. The State Forester shall devote
49 his or her full time to the duties of histhe office. He or she
50 shall be required to take the oath of office and give bond in
51 the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).00."
52 "§9-3-7
53 (a) The commission shall have its main offices in the
54 City of Montgomery; provided, that it. The commission may
55 establish other district or subdistrict offices and facilities
56 throughout the state in such places as it may deemas the
Page 2

throughout the state in such places as it may deemas the
HB267 Enrolled
57 commission deems advisable or necessary.
58 (b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, no
59 construction or maintenance projects involving commission
60 offices or facilities shall be subject to the jurisdiction or
61 oversight of the Division of Construction Management within
62 the Department of Finance unless the cost of the project
63 exceeds seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000). The
64 Division of Construction Management shall retain its authority
65 to adopt a uniform minimum building standards code that will
66 apply to such projects costing seven hundred fifty thousand
67 dollars ($750,000) or less."
68 "§9-13-3
69 (a) The commission shall give such advice, assistance,
70 and cooperation as may be practicable to private landowners
71 and promote, so far as it may be able, a proper appreciation
72 in this state among all classes of the population of the
73 benefits to be derived from forest culture, preservation, and
74 use.
75 (b) The commission may take suchreasonable and
76 practicable measures as may be reasonable and practicable to
77 prevent and suppress forest fires and other influences harmful
78 to forest growth and may apply such parts of the forestry
79 fundexpend monies from the Special State Forestry Fund and
80 other funds accruing to itthe commission as may be necessary
81 to implement such purposes and to providingprovide such
82 systems of control as itthe commission may establish, either
83 independently or in cooperation with the federal government
84 and other agencies, public or private.
Page 3

and other agencies, public or private.
HB267 Enrolled
85 (c) The commission shall be the sole cooperating agency
86 in joint work in the promotion and development of forestry and
87 other matters and interests devolving upon it by law, among
88 all classes of land ownership in the state, in which both the
89 state and the federal government may have financial or
90 administrative participation.
91 (d)(1) The commission, for the purpose of establishing,
92 developing, and maintaining state forests, administrative
93 headquarters sitessites for offices or facilities, tower
94 sites, and other areas necessary for its efficient operation,
95 may acquire land by donation, purchase, condemnation, or
96 lease, and for these purposes may useexpend such funds as may
97 be available to itthe commission and not otherwise obligated,
98 and may enter into agreements with the federal government or
99 other agencies and private landowners for acquiring by lease,
100 purchase, or otherwise such lands as in its judgment arethe
101 commission deems desirable or necessary.
102 (2) When lands are acquired or leased under this
103 section, the commission is authorized to make expenditures
104 frommay expend any funds available to the commission and not
105 otherwise obligated, for the management, development, and
106 utilization of such areaslands, to sell or otherwise dispose
107 of products from such lands, to have sole charge of all state
108 forests and other lands that have been acquired hereunder, and
109 to have authority to make suchadopt rules and regulations for
110 the management, administration, occupancy, and use of said
111 lands and all property and things of whatsoever nature therein
112 or thereon as it shall find necessaryproperty in state forests
Page 4

or thereon as it shall find necessaryproperty in state forests
HB267 Enrolled
113 and lands acquired by the commission.
114 (3) The commission shall have full power and authority
115 tomay sell, exchange, or lease lands under its jurisdiction
116 when in its judgment it is advantageous to the state to do so
117 in the orderly development and management of state forests and
118 other designated areas; provided, however, that said sale,
119 lease or exchange shall not be contrary to the terms of any
120 contract which it has entered into. Any sale or lease of lands
121 by the commission is subject to Article 3 of Chapter 15 of
122 Title 9 except for the sale or lease of land that has an
123 appraised or assessed value not exceeding fifty thousand
124 ($50,000).
125 (e) The commission may employ such officers,
126 assistants, and employees as may be necessary and, as to
127 personsindividuals employed wholly or in part in carrying out
128 the provisions of cooperative agreements with the federal
129 government or other agencies, for such compensation heretofore
130 or hereafter paid may use suchthe contributions or receipts as
131 may be derived from the United States or from any private or
132 philanthropic source to pay the compensation of these
133 individuals."
134 "§9-13-10
135 All employees of the State Forestry Commission
136 appointed as forest law enforcement officers by the State
137 Forester are hereby constituted peace officers of the State of
138 Alabama with full police power and may exercise such powers
139 anywhere within the state. They are hereby authorized to carry
140 firearms or other weapons when they are actually in the
Page 5

firearms or other weapons when they are actually in the
HB267 Enrolled
141 discharge of their duties as such officers as provided by law.
142 They shall be clothed with the power to arrest with or without
143 warrant any person who shall violate any of the laws of the
144 State of Alabama or any rule or regulation of the Alabama
145 Forestry Commission and take him before a proper court for
146 trial. All employees of the State Forestry Commission and all
147 duly appointed officers of the United States whose duty it is
148 to prevent and suppress forest fires are empowered to enter
149 any lands and to construct thereon fire lines, fire lanes, or
150 fire breaksfirebreaks, to set back fires thereon if necessary
151 to prevent the further spread of fire then actually burning,
152 and to do all other work necessary in the performance of their
153 duties, including the right to enter any lands for the purpose
154 of making investigations for the cause or causes of fires,
155 without liability for trespass or damage therefrom."
156 "§9-13-11
157 (a) It shall be a Class C felony for everyany person,
158 firm, association, or corporation to do either of the
159 following:
160 (1) Willfully, maliciously, or intentionally burnsburn,
161 setsset fire to, attemptsattempt to set fire to, or
162 causescause to be burned or any fire to be set to any forest,
163 grass, woodlands, or other inflammable vegetation on any lands
164 not owned, leased, controlled, or in the lawful possession of
165 the person, firm, association, or corporation setting the fire
166 or burning such lands or causing the fire to be set or lands
167 to be burned.
168 (2) Shall haveHave in his or her possession or shall
Page 6

(2) Shall haveHave in his or her possession or shall
HB267 Enrolled
169 set, throw, or place any device, instrument, or other
170 incendiary paraphernalia, including any time-delay incendiary
171 device, in or adjacent to any forest, grass, woodlands, or
172 other inflammable vegetation, whichif the forest, grass,
173 woodland, or other inflammable vegetation is not owned,
174 leased, controlled, or in the lawful possession of the person
175 possessing suchthe device, instrument, or paraphernalia.
176 (b) It shall be a Class B misdemeanor for any person,
177 firm, association, or corporation to do any of the following:
178 (1) Who recklesslyRecklessly or with wanton disregard
179 for the safety of persons or property allowsallow a fire to
180 escape from land owned, leased, or controlled by him or her,
181 whereby any property of another is injured or destroyed;.
182 (2) Who shall burnBurn any brush, stumps, logs,
183 rubbish, fallen timber, grass, stubble, or debris of any sort,
184 whether on one's own land or that of another, without taking
185 reasonably necessary precautions, both before lighting the
186 fire and all times thereafter to prevent the escape thereof;.
187 (3) Who shall setSet fire to any brush, stumps, logs,
188 rubbish, fallen timber, grass, stubble, or debris of any sort
189 within or near any forest or woodland, unless the area
190 surrounding said material to be burned shall beis cleared of
191 all inflammable material for a reasonably safe distance in all
192 directions and maintained free of all inflammable material so
193 long as such fire shall continuecontinues to burn;.
194 (4) Who shall setSet a fire within or near any forest,
195 woodland, or grassland without clearing the ground immediately
196 around it free from material whichthat will carry fire, or
Page 7

around it free from material whichthat will carry fire, or
HB267 Enrolled
197 shall leave such fire before itthe fire is totally
198 extinguished, or start a fire in any forest, woodland, or
199 grassland by throwing away a lighted cigar, cigarette, or
200 match or by the use of firearms or in any other manner and
201 leave the same unextinguished;.
202 (5) Who shall destroyDestroy, remove, injure, or deface
203 any fire warning or notices or deface any inscription or
204 devices comprising such notices;.
205 (6) Who shall burn any new ground, field, grasslands,
206 or woodlands, or adjoining woodlands or grasslands of another
207 within any area which has been placed under organized forest
208 fire protection by the State Forestry CommissionConduct any
209 prescribed burning, as defined in 9-13-272(2), without first
210 obtaining verbal authorizationa burn permit from the State
211 Forestry Commission by obtaining a burning permit number.
212 (c) It shall be a Class A misdemeanor for any person to
213 recklessly or with wanton disregard for the safety of persons
214 or property burn, set fire to, attempt to set fire to, or
215 cause to be burned or any fire to be set to any forest, grass,
216 woodlands, or other inflammable vegetation on any lands not
217 owned, leased, controlled, or in the lawful possession of the
218 person setting the fire or burning such lands or causing the
219 fire to be set or lands to be burned without the permission of
220 the lawful owner.
221 (d) (1) Burning permits may be obtained from the
222 district operations center when the center is in active
223 operation. The following criteria must be met:
224 a. The person requesting the permit must have adequate
Page 8

a. The person requesting the permit must have adequate
HB267 Enrolled
225 tools, equipment, and manpower to stay with and control the
226 fire during the entire burning period.
227 b. The person requesting the permit is responsible to
228 keep the fire confined.
229 c. In no case will the person requesting the permit
230 allow the fire to be unattended until it is dead out.
231 (2) Burning permits will be issued if the individual
232 requesting the permit states that the above criteria will be
233 met unless the State Forester shall declare a fire alert.
234 Under fire alert conditions the State Forester may allow
235 issuance of permits at his or her discretion, taking into
236 account the number of fires burning in the district, current
237 and projected weather conditions, the ability of the person
238 seeking the permit to contain the fire and that individual's
239 knowledge of fire behavior, and other factors which may affect
240 fires and fire behavior. A fire alert will be issued by the
241 State Forester for any district or portion of a district that
242 in the opinion of the State Forester, has existing conditions
243 which produce extraordinary danger from fire or smoke.
244 (3) If subsequent to issuance of a permit a lawfully
245 authorized fire escapes to the lands of another and an
246 investigation reveals that the permit holder did not meet all
247 the criteria as set forth above, the fire will be treated as
248 if no legal authorization had been obtained.
249 (4) A burning permit once issued may be revoked if the
250 person requesting the permit fails to comply with proper
251 burning procedures or if weather conditions develop which may
252 result in erratic fire or smoke behavior.
Page 9

result in erratic fire or smoke behavior.
HB267 Enrolled
253 (e) An area shall be deemed legally placed under
254 organized forest fire protection by the State Forestry
255 Commission of the State of Alabama upon proclamation of the
256 State Forester. Such proclamation shall describe the lands
257 placed in said area and shall be published once a week for two
258 consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in the county where
259 the lands composing said area are located. If there are no
260 newspapers published in the county where said lands are
261 located, then said proclamation shall be published in a
262 newspaper of an adjoining county. In the event the lands
263 composing said area are located in more than one county, such
264 proclamation shall be so published in a newspaper in each
265 county where said lands are located. Beginning with the
266 twelfth day after the first publication of said proclamation
267 in said newspaper or newspapers, the lands described in the
268 proclamation shall be deemed in an area under organized forest
269 fire protection. Upon the trial of any person, firm, or
270 corporation for the violation of any provision of this
271 section, a certified copy of said proclamation executed by the
272 State Forester shall be admissible in evidence and shall be
273 conclusive evidence of the fact that the lands described in
274 said proclamation constitute an area under organized forest
275 fire protection within the meaning of this section.
276 (f)(d) All moneysmonies collected for any violation of
277 this section as fines, or forfeitures, etc., shall go tobe
278 deposited into the Alabama Forestry Commission Fund and shall
279 be used in defraying the expense of the administration of
280 suchthe State Forestry Commission."
Page 10

suchthe State Forestry Commission."
HB267 Enrolled
281 "§9-13-12
282 Any fire burning uncontrolled on any forested, cutover,
283 brushland, or grassland area is hereby declared to be a public
284 nuisance by reason of its menace to life and property. Any
285 person, firm, association or corporation responsible either
286 for the starting or the existence of sucha fire is hereby
287 required toshall make a reasonable effort to control or
288 extinguish itthe fire as soon as he or she has knowledge
289 thereof, and if such person, firm, association or corporation
290 shall refuse or neglect to do so, anyof the fire. Any
291 organized fire suppression force may suppress the nuisance
292 thus constituted by controlling and extinguishing the fire,
293 and the cost thereof may be recovered from saidthe person,
294 firm, association or corporation responsible for the starting
295 or existence of suchthe fire."
296 "§9-13-140
297 Whenever conditions exist in any county or counties in
298 this state which produce extraordinary danger from fire, the
299 State Forestry Commission, with approval of the Governor, may
300 by regulation declareorder, declare a droughtwildfire
301 emergency condition in suchthe county or counties."
302 "§9-13-141
303 At such time as the State Forestry Commission has
304 declared by regulation a droughtwildfire emergency in any
305 county or counties, it shall be unlawful in suchthe county or
306 counties for any person to set fire to any forest, grass,
307 woods, wildlands, or marshes or to build a campfire or bonfire
308 or to burn trash or other material that may cause a forest,
Page 11

or to burn trash or other material that may cause a forest,
HB267 Enrolled
309 grass, or woods fire. This prohibition does not apply to any
310 backfire set by an official representative or agent of the
311 State Forestry Commission. Nor does this prohibition apply
312 when a backfire is set by any person for the purpose of saving
313 life or property;, provided, that suchthe person shall have
314 the burden of proving the necessity for setting suchthe
315 backfire if he or she claims same as a defense."
316 "§9-13-142
317 Any person violating any provision of this article
318 shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor and, upon conviction
319 thereof, shall be fined not less than $250.00 nor more than
320 $500.00 and, at the discretion of the court, may be sentenced
321 to the county jail for a period not exceeding six months."
322 "§9-13-221
323 (a) It shall be the duty of any sheriff, policeman,
324 forestry officer,police officer, or other peace officer or law
325 enforcement officer in the State of Alabama, who is arresting
326 any person who is charged with violating or attempting to
327 violate Section 9-13-60 or any felony laws of the State of
328 Alabama involving timber or forest products or transactions
329 pertaining thereto, to seize any vehicle and equipment used,
330 which is in the possession or under control of the person or
331 persons charged with violating the laws, and to deliver any
332 suchthe seized vehicle and equipment, to the regional forester
333 of the forestry region in which the arrest is madeState
334 Forester or his or her designee. The person receiving any
335 vehicle and equipment from the arresting officer shall keep
336 itthe vehicle and equipment in a safe place and in as good
Page 12

itthe vehicle and equipment in a safe place and in as good
HB267 Enrolled
337 condition as when received, until disposed of as hereinafter
338 provided.
339 (b) The seizure of vehicles and equipment provided in
340 this section is authorized only when the arrest is for a crime
341 involving the theft of timber harvesting equipment or the
342 parts thereof, the harvesting, removal, transportation, or
343 disposal of any forest products, or any other transactions
344 related to forest products or timber harvesting equipment or
345 any part or parts from timber harvesting equipment."
346 "§9-13-222
347 Within five days after the arrest or final conviction
348 of any person for violating Section 9-13-60 or any felony laws
349 of the State of Alabama outlineddescribed in this
350 articleSection 9-13-221, the person receiving possession ofwho
351 seizes any vehicle and equipment, seized as aforesaidas
352 required by Section 9-13-221, shall report the seizure and
353 detention of the vehicle and equipment to the district
354 attorney or other prosecuting official, giving a full
355 description of suchthe vehicle and equipment, any
356 identification number, make and model thereof, the name of the
357 person in whose possession itthe vehicle or equipment was
358 found when seized, the person, if any, making claim to samethe
359 vehicle or equipment or any interest thereinin the vehicle or
360 equipment if the name can be ascertained or is known, and the
361 date and place of the seizure, and a statement of the
362 circumstances surrounding the seizing of the property."
363 "§9-13-225
364 (a) When any judgment of condemnation or forfeiture is
Page 13

(a) When any judgment of condemnation or forfeiture is
HB267 Enrolled
365 made in any case filed under the provisions of this section,
366 the judge making suchthe judgment shall order and direct that
367 saidthe seized vehicle and equipment be forfeited or awarded
368 to the State Forester to be sold or used by him in the
369 enforcement of the lawthe Alabama Forestry Commission or sold
370 pursuant to Section 9-3-22.
371 (b) And said order, in the event thatIf no appeal is
372 taken within 15 days from the rendition thereof,after the
373 order is made, the order shall be carried out and executed.
374 The court, at its discretion, shall direct in said judgment
375 that the cost of the proceedings be paid by the
376 person(s)person or persons in whose possession saidthe vehicle
377 and equipment were found when seized, or by any party or
378 parties that claim to own saidthe vehicle and equipment, or
379 any interest therein, and who contested the condemnation and
380 forfeiture thereof. The State Forester shall keep a permanent
381 record of all such vehicles and equipment forfeited and
382 awarded to him as provided for herein, tothe State Forester
383 and the vehicles and equipment shall be accounted for as other
384 public property."
385 Section 2. Sections 9-3-5.1 and 9-13-11.1 are added to
386 the Code of Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
387 §9-3-5.1
388 The State Forester may declare, by order, a wildfire
389 alert whenever, in his or her opinion, existing weather or
390 other conditions produce a heightened level of danger from
391 fire or smoke. The wildfire alert may be issued for the
392 entirety of the state or for designated portions of the state.
Page 14

entirety of the state or for designated portions of the state.
HB267 Enrolled
393 §9-13-11.1
394 (a) For the purposes of this section, the term
395 "prescribed burn" shall have the same meaning as defined in
396 Section 9-13-272.
397 (b) No person shall conduct any prescribed burn without
398 first obtaining a burn permit from the State Forestry
399 Commission. Burn permits shall be issued in the manner
400 determined by rule of the State Forester. This may include
401 issuing permits electronically.
402 (c) A person may obtain a burn permit only if the
403 requesting individual makes a declaration that the following
404 criteria are met:
405 (1) The person requesting the permit has adequate
406 tools, equipment, manpower, and other resources to stay with
407 and control the fire during the entire burning period.
408 (2) The person requesting the permit is sufficiently
409 skilled and responsibly able to keep the fire controlled.
410 (3) The person requesting the permit may not allow the
411 fire to be unattended until the fire is fully contained,
412 meaning that the fire, and any burning or smoldering material
413 from the fire, must be entirely within established or natural
414 firebreaks.
415 (d) The State Forester may decline to issue a requested
416 burn permit under any of the following circumstances:
417 (1) The person requesting the burn permit has in the
418 past demonstrated reckless or irresponsible conduct while
419 conducting prescribed burns. Reckless or irresponsible conduct
420 includes, but is not limited to, the person allowing multiple
Page 15

includes, but is not limited to, the person allowing multiple
HB267 Enrolled
421 prescribed burns to escape containment and cause material
422 damage to adjacent land or require the State Forestry
423 Commission or fire department to respond to or suppress the
424 fire.
425 (2) The person requesting the burn permit is seeking to
426 conduct a prescribed burn in any area for which the State
427 Forester has issued a wildfire alert. Under these
428 circumstances, the State Forester shall take into account the
429 current number of wildfires in the area and the state
430 generally, current and projected weather conditions, the
431 knowledge, training, and ability of the person seeking the
432 burn permit to control and contain the prescribed burn, and
433 any other factors relevant to determining whether issuing the
434 requested burn permit might create an unreasonable risk of
435 injury to individuals or property.
436 (e) If it is determined that a burn permit was issued
437 by the State Forestry Commission based on any false
438 declaration by the person who requested the burn permit, any
439 prescribed burn conducted pursuant to the false declaration
440 and permit shall be treated as if no legal authorization has
441 been obtained.
442 (f) If it is determined that a burn permit was issued
443 based on any false declaration by the person who requested the
444 burn permit, the burn permit may be revoked by the State
445 Forestry Commission.
446 (g) A burn permit that has already been issued may be
447 revoked at any time by the State Forestry Commission if any
448 person conducting a prescribed burn fails to comply with
Page 16

person conducting a prescribed burn fails to comply with
HB267 Enrolled
449 proper prescribed burning procedures.
450 (h) Regardless of the conduct of any person conducting
451 a prescribed burn pursuant to an issued burn permit, the State
452 Forestry Commission may revoke a burn permit at any time if
453 weather or other conditions develop which may produce erratic
454 fire or smoke behavior or other circumstances that may create
455 an unreasonable risk of injury to individuals or property.
456 (i) If a burn permit is revoked by the State Forestry
457 Commission, any continuation of a prescribed burn conducted
458 pursuant to the burn permit, except actions by the person
459 conducting the prescribed burn to contain, suppress, or
460 otherwise control a prescribed burn that was commenced before
461 the burn permit was revoked, shall be treated as if no legal
462 authorization had been obtained.
463 (j) The State Forestry Commission may adopt rules and
464 forms to implement and administer this chapter.
465 Section 3. Sections 9-13-5, 9-13-6, 9-13-7, 9-13-8, and
466 9-13-9, Code of Alabama 1975, providing for the appointment,
467 duties, and compensation of forest fire wardens; Sections
468 9-13-13, 9-13-14, and 9-13-15, Code of Alabama 1975,
469 prohibiting certain conduct as a precaution against the spread
470 of fire; and Sections 9-13-24, 9-13-64, 9-13-223, and
471 9-13-226, Code of Alabama 1975, establishing the powers and
472 duties of employees, fees for arresting officers, and
473 procedures regarding the reporting of and award of property
474 after timber theft, are repealed.
475 Section 4. This act shall become effective on October
476 1, 2026.
Page 17

1, 2026.
HB267 Enrolled
477
478
479
480
481
482
483
484
485
486 ________________________________________________
487 Speaker of the House of Representatives
488
489
490
491 ________________________________________________
492 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
493
494
495 House of Representatives
496
497 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
498 was passed by the House 05-Feb-26, as amended.
499
500 John Treadwell
501 Clerk
502
503
504
505
506
507 Senate 01-Apr-26 Passed
508
509
510
Page 18